Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-271
Ferguson House; sale prohibited.

The Department of Administrative Services shall not sell the property known as the Ferguson House and the appurtenant carriage house located at 700 South 16th Street, Lincoln, Nebraska. The legal description of this property is lots 4, 5, and 6, block 153, original plat, Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 1092, § 10.